Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-4326
Signatures; validity.

In case any officers whose signatures appear on any bonds or coupons cease to be such officers before the delivery of such obligations, such signatures shall nevertheless be valid and sufficient for all purposes to the same extent as if such officers had remained in office until such delivery.

Laws 1987, LB 398, § 26.